Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB2282.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Title 42 of the Pennsylvania Consolidated Statutes is amended by adding a section to read:§ 8105. Bankruptcy exemption.(a) Choice.--In a bankruptcy proceeding filed in this Commonwealth under 11 U.S.C. (relating to bankruptcy), an individual or married couple filing jointly may choose the Federal exemptions contained in 11 U.S.C. § 522(d) (relating to exemptions) or the following:(1) Up to $650,000 in aggregate equity in real or personal property used as a primary residence by the debtor or a dependent of the debtor or in a cooperative that owns property that the debtor or a dependent of the debtor uses as a primary residence. The debtor's exemption in the property 123456789101112131415161718 shall be determined as of the date the bankruptcy petition is filed. If the value of the debtor's interest in the property on the petition date is less than or equal to the amount that can be exempted under this paragraph, the debtor's entire interest in the property is exempt, including the debtor's right to possession and interests of no monetary value. Any appreciation in the value of the debtor's exempt interest in the property during the bankruptcy case shall be exempt, even if in excess of the amount under this paragraph.(2) Personal property not exempted under paragraph (3), a total value of $50,000 for individual filers and $100,000 for married couples filing jointly, plus the aggregate of the payments due in the year before the bankruptcy petition for taxes, domestic support obligations or educational debts that are not dischargeable, utility bills and phone and Internet services.(3) Twenty thousand dollars for individual filers or $40,000 for married couples filing jointly in equity in vehicles.(4) The following types of property, including the right to receive the property and property traceable to the property, are exempt in total:(i) All property exempt from judgment under section 8124 (relating to exemption of particular property).(ii) Health aids, including wheelchairs, canes, hearing aids or other medically necessary items for the debtor or a dependent of the debtor.(iii) Current wages and benefits from employment.(iv) Alimony, support and maintenance subject to 23 Pa.C.S. (relating to domestic relations).20260HB2282PN2988 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (v) Up to two burial plots, as defined in 9 Pa.C.S. § 101 (relating to definitions).(vi) Social Security benefits.(vii) College savings plans.(viii) Unemployment benefits arising under the act of December 5, 1936 (2nd Sp.Sess., 1937 P.L.2897, No.1), known as the Unemployment Compensation Law.(ix) Workers' compensation arising under the act of June 2, 1915 (P.L.736, No.338), known as the Workers' Compensation Act.(x) Medical assistance, as defined in section 1401 of the act of June 13, 1967 (P.L.31, No.21), known as the Human Services Code.(xi) All benefits arising under a Federal program, including Temporary Assistance for Needy Families, the Supplemental Nutrition Assistance Program, Women Infants and Children, Children's Health Insurance Program, Section 8 housing vouchers, Low-Income Home Energy Assistance Program, Weatherization Assistance Program and Federal Student Aid, including grants, loans and work-study programs.(xii) Tax refunds.(xiii) Court-ordered restitution payments.(xiv) Benefits arising under the act of June 24, 1976 (P.L.424, No.101), referred to as the Emergency and Law Enforcement Personnel Death Benefits Act.(xv) Benefits arising under 38 U.S.C. (relating to veterans' benefits), or excluded by 51 Pa.C.S. Ch. 99 (relating to veterans' benefit payment exclusion).(xvi) Awards for the debtor or a dependent of the 20260HB2282PN2988 - 3 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 debtor received as the result of a civil remedy, including for the loss of future earnings, recovery for wrongful deaths, medical payments and pain and suffering.(b) Adjustment of dollar amount.--(1) On April 1, 2026, and April 1 in each third calendar year thereafter, the Supreme Court shall adjust each dollar amount under this section to reflect any increase in the Consumer Price Index for All Urban Consumers, as published by the United States Department of Labor for the three-year period ending on December 31 of the preceding year. Adjustments required by this paragraph shall be rounded to the nearest $25.(2) The Supreme Court shall transmit notice of the dollar amount to the Legislative Reference Bureau for publication in the next available issue of the Pennsylvania Bulletin.(3) The Supreme Court may publish the notice in another manner that the court concludes would be reasonably likely to inform persons who are affected by the adjustment of the dollar amounts.Section 2. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20260HB2282PN2988 - 4 - 123456789101112131415161718192021